Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1567
Terms, defined.

As used in sections 81-1567 to 81-1570, unless the context otherwise requires:

(1) Discharge shall mean any leakage, seepage, or other release;

(2) Hazardous materials shall mean all materials and substances which are defined as hazardous by Nebraska or federal law or by the regulations of any Nebraska or federal government agency as of July 10, 1984; and

(3) Person shall mean any individual, partnership, limited liability company, corporation, association, or other entity.

Laws 1984, LB 420, § 1;

Laws 1993, LB 121, § 540.